Utah statutes.
32A-12-104.   Violation of title a misdemeanor.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in this title, a person is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor if that person violates:
(a)  this chapter; or
(b)  a provision of this title that is expressly identified as a criminal
offense.
(2)  This section is not applicable to an adjudicative proceeding under
Section 32A-1-119, but only:
(a)  makes a violation described in Subsection (1) a criminal offense; and
(b)  establishes a penalty for a violation described in Subsection (1) that is
prosecuted criminally.
